Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 77.1 Funding of Charter Public Schools
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-77.1-1.
Statement of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide a funding mechanism through which costs for charter public schools will be shared between the state and the local school districts sending students to a charter public school.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 366, § 2.

16-77.1-2.
Operating costs.

Operating costs of a charter public school shall be the total of the per pupil payments for each student attending the charter public school. The per pupil payment for each student shall be determined based on the per pupil cost for the district of residence of each student. The state’s share of the per pupil amount for each student attending the charter public school shall be paid by the state directly to the charter public school and shall be the percent, or share ratio, previously calculated under chapter 7 of this title; provided, that in no case shall the ratio be less than thirty percent (30%), minus the five percent (5%) of per pupil cost designated for indirect cost support to the student’s school district as defined in subsection (b). The five percent (5%) indirect cost amount shall be deducted from the district per pupil cost before the state share is derived by applying the share ratio to the district per pupil cost. The local share of the per pupil amount for each student attending the charter public school shall be paid to the charter public school by the district of residence of the student and shall be the per pupil cost for the district of residence of the student minus the state share of that per pupil cost as designated in this section.

In addition to all state aid to education paid to a local district pursuant to chapter 7.1 of this title, the state will pay an additional amount to the district for each student from this district who is attending a charter public school. The additional amount of state aid per pupil shall be five percent (5%) of the districts per pupil cost. The additional state aid shall be for the purpose of assisting local school districts to undertake the indirect costs borne by a district when its student attends a charter public school.

The state department of elementary and secondary education shall annually determine both the state and local share of each charter public school’s operating costs by deriving the respective shares associated with each student reported as a member of the charter public school as of June 30 of the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16(11)

(or the enrollment as of October 1 of the current school year in the first year of operation of a charter school). All other data used in this determination shall be based upon the reference year as defined in §

16-7-16(11)

.

The state shall make payments of its share of operating costs to each charter public school on a quarterly basis in July, October, January, and April. The July and October payments will be based upon the reported student membership of the charter public school as of June 30 of the reference year as defined in § 16-7-16(11) (or the enrollment as of October 1 of the current school year in the first year of operation of a charter school). Charter public schools will report current student enrollment, including district of residence for school purposes of each student enrolled, and each district will report current total district operating expenses and total district enrollments (including district students enrolled in charter public schools) annually by October 1. If the October 1 data on a charter public school’s student enrollment show a ten percent (10%) or greater increase or decrease in students from the June membership count, the third and fourth quarter payments to the charter public school will be adjusted to reflect actual student enrollment in the charter public school.

Local district payments to charter public schools for each district’s students enrolled in the charter public school shall also be made quarterly as designated in subsection (d); the first local district payment shall be made by August 15 instead of July. Any local school district more than thirty (30) days in arrears on a quarterly payment for its student(s) enrolled in a charter public school shall have the amount of the arrearage deducted from state aid to that district and the withheld arrearage shall be paid by the state directly to the charter public school.

Local school districts with student(s) enrolled in a charter public school shall continue to report these students in the total census of district public school students and will receive state aid for all these students pursuant to the provisions of chapter 7.1 of this title.

All entitlements except those provided for in §

16-24-6.2

shall be ratably reduced if less than one hundred percent (100%) of the expenditures is appropriated.

For fiscal year 2007, the indirect aid paid to districts pursuant to this section shall equal the amount received in the fiscal year 2006 enacted budget by the 2005 general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 366, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, §§ 3, 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 8.

16-77.1-3.
Federal funds for charter public schools start up costs.

Charter public schools may apply for federal funds to support start up costs. Charter public schools shall become eligible to apply for federal funds upon approval of the charter public school’s application by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education. Federal funds shall be distributed to charter public schools by the department of elementary and secondary education through a process which requires each charter public school seeking the funds to submit a grant application to the department of elementary and secondary education. The grant application process shall be established and implemented by the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 366, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 18, § 3.

16-77.1-4.
State funds for charter public schools start up costs.

In the event that federal funds are either unavailable or are fully expended, there shall be established a system of interest free loans for start up costs for charter public schools to be provided from an appropriation of state funds designated by the legislature for this purpose. The loans shall not exceed one hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a single charter public school and this loan of state funds shall be repaid in equal monthly installments over no more than five (5) years. The state funds shall be distributed to charter public schools by the department of elementary and secondary education through a process which requires each charter public school seeking the funds to submit a loan application to the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 366, § 2.

16-77.1-5.
Facilities support for charter public schools.

A public school district or districts may access state aid for reimbursement of school housing costs for district sponsored charter public schools pursuant to §§

16-7-35

through

16-7-47

. Public charter schools not sponsored by a public school district or districts may apply for thirty percent (30%) reimbursement of school housing cost on the basis of demonstrated need. The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate regulations to implement this section consistent with the purposes and procedures of the existing school housing aid program pursuant to §§

16-7-35

through

16-7-47

. For purposes of this section only, “facilities support, the urban collaborative accelerated program” will be defined as a charter school.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 366, § 2.

16-77.1-6.
Charter public schools eligible for funding.

For purposes of this chapter, a charter public school shall be all schools as defined in chapter 77 of this title and shall also include the Textron Chamber of Commerce Academy and the Times 2 Academy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 366, § 2.

16-77.1-7.
Regulations.

In addition to those regulations specifically required by §

16-77.1-5

, the department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate any additional regulations that are necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 366, § 2.